District of Columbia statutes.
2-1219.03

Repealed

Board of Directors.

Repealed.

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 4, 45 DCR 3747
Oct. 16, 1998, D.C. Law 12-169, § 301(b), 45 DCR 5187
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 12, 46 DCR 2118
June 12, 1999, D.C. Law 12-285, § 4(c), 46 DCR 1355
June 18, 1999, D.C. Law 12-288, §§ 3(a)-(c), 45 DCR 4471
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 1102(a), 46 DCR 6373
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 8, 49 DCR 8140
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689
1981 Ed., § 1-2295.3.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 4(c) of the Confirmation Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-25, March 15, 1999, 46 DCR 2971).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 4(c) of the Confirmation Act Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-92, June 4, 1999, 46 DCR 5330).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1102(a) of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).